Illinois, session 104th, SB28.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 524-16.5, 24A-2.5, 24A-4, 24A-5, 24A-7, 24A-15, 24A-20, 34-8, 6and 34-85c as follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/24-16.5)8    Sec. 24-16.5. Optional alternative evaluative dismissal 9process for PERA evaluations.10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Applicable hearing requirements" means (i) for any school 12district having less than 500,000 inhabitants or a program of 13a special education joint agreement, those procedures and 14requirements relating to a teacher's request for a hearing, 15selection of a hearing officer, pre-hearing and hearing 16procedures, and post-hearing briefs set forth in paragraphs 17(1) through (6) of subsection (d) of Section 24-12 of this Code 18or (ii) for a school district having 500,000 inhabitants or 19more, those procedures and requirements relating to a 20teacher's request for a hearing, selection of a hearing 21officer, pre-hearing and hearing procedures, and post-hearing 22briefs set forth in paragraphs (1) through (5) of subsection 23(a) of Section 34-85 of this Code.  SB0028 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    "Board" means, for a school district having less than 2500,000 inhabitants or a program of a special education joint 3agreement, the board of directors, board of education, or 4board of school inspectors, as the case may be. For a school 5district having 500,000 inhabitants or more, "board" means the 6Chicago Board of Education.7    "Evaluator" means an evaluator, as defined in Section 824A-2.5 of this Code, who has successfully completed the 9pre-qualification program described in subsection (b) of 10Section 24A-3 of this Code.11    "PERA-trained board member" means a member of a board that 12has completed a training program on PERA evaluations either 13administered or approved by the State Board of Education.14    "PERA evaluation" means a performance evaluation of a 15teacher after the implementation date of an evaluation system 16for teachers, as specified by Section 24A-2.5 of this Code, 17using a performance evaluation instrument and process that 18meets the minimum requirements for teacher evaluation 19instruments and processes set forth in rules adopted by the 20State Board of Education to implement Public Act 96-861.21    "Remediation" means the remediation plan, mid-point and 22final evaluations, and related processes and requirements set 23forth in subdivisions (i), (j), and (k) of Section 24A-5 of 24this Code.25    "School district" means a school district or a program of 26a special education joint agreement.  SB0028 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    "Second evaluator" means an evaluator who either conducts 2the mid-point and final remediation evaluation or conducts an 3independent assessment of whether the teacher completed the 4remediation plan with a rating equal to or better than a 5"Proficient" rating, all in accordance with subdivision (c) of 6this Section.7    "Student growth components" means the components of a 8performance evaluation plan described in subdivision (c) of 9Section 24A-5 of this Code, as may be supplemented by 10administrative rules adopted by the State Board of Education.11    "Teacher practice components" means the components of a 12performance evaluation plan described in subdivisions (a) and 13(b) of Section 24A-5 of this Code, as may be supplemented by 14administrative rules adopted by the State Board of Education.15    "Teacher representatives" means the exclusive bargaining 16representative of a school district's teachers or, if no 17exclusive bargaining representatives exists, a representative 18committee selected by teachers.19    (b) This Section applies to all school districts, 20including those having 500,000 or more inhabitants. The 21optional dismissal process set forth in this Section is an 22alternative to those set forth in Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of 23this Code. Nothing in this Section is intended to change the 24existing practices or precedents under Section 24-12 or 34-85 25of this Code, nor shall this Section be interpreted as 26implying standards and procedures that should or must be used   SB0028 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1as part of a remediation that precedes a dismissal sought 2under Section 24-12 or 34-85 of this Code.3    A board may dismiss a teacher who has entered upon 4contractual continued service under this Section if the 5following are met:6        (1) the cause of dismissal is that the teacher has 7    failed to complete a remediation plan with a rating equal 8    to or better than a "Proficient" rating;9        (2) the "Unsatisfactory" performance evaluation rating 10    that preceded remediation resulted from a PERA evaluation; 11    and12        (3) the school district has complied with subsection 13    (c) of this Section.14    A school district may not, through agreement with a 15teacher or its teacher representatives, waive its right to 16dismiss a teacher under this Section.17    (c) Each school district electing to use the dismissal 18process set forth in this Section must comply with the 19pre-remediation and remediation activities and requirements 20set forth in this subsection (c).21        (1) Before a school district's first remediation 22    relating to a dismissal under this Section, the school 23    district must create and establish a list of at least 2 24    evaluators who will be available to serve as second 25    evaluators under this Section. The school district shall 26    provide its teacher representatives with an opportunity to   SB0028 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    submit additional names of teacher evaluators who will be 2    available to serve as second evaluators and who will be 3    added to the list created and established by the school 4    district, provided that, unless otherwise agreed to by the 5    school district, the teacher representatives may not 6    submit more teacher evaluators for inclusion on the list 7    than the number of evaluators submitted by the school 8    district. Each teacher evaluator must either have (i) 9    National Board of Professional Teaching Standards 10    certification, with no "Unsatisfactory" or "Needs 11    Improvement" performance evaluating ratings in his or her 12    2 most recent performance evaluation ratings; or (ii) 13    "Excellent" performance evaluation ratings in 2 of his or 14    her 3 most recent performance evaluations, with no "Needs 15    Improvement" or "Unsatisfactory" performance evaluation 16    ratings in his or her last 3 ratings. If the teacher 17    representatives do not submit a list of teacher evaluators 18    within 21 days after the school district's request, the 19    school district may proceed with a remediation using a 20    list that includes only the school district's selections. 21    Either the school district or the teacher representatives 22    may revise or add to their selections for the list at any 23    time with notice to the other party, subject to the 24    limitations set forth in this paragraph (1).25        (2) Before a school district's first remediation 26    relating to a dismissal under this Section, the school   SB0028 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    district shall, in good faith cooperation with its teacher 2    representatives, establish a process for the selection of 3    a second evaluator from the list created pursuant to 4    paragraph (1) of this subsection (c). Such process may be 5    amended at any time in good faith cooperation with the 6    teacher representatives. If the teacher representatives 7    are given an opportunity to cooperate with the school 8    district and elect not to do so, the school district may, 9    at its discretion, establish or amend the process for 10    selection. Before the hearing officer and as part of any 11    judicial review of a dismissal under this Section, a 12    teacher may not challenge a remediation or dismissal on 13    the grounds that the process used by the school district 14    to select a second evaluator was not established in good 15    faith cooperation with its teacher representatives.16        (3) For each remediation preceding a dismissal under 17    this Section, the school district shall select a second 18    evaluator from the list of second evaluators created 19    pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection (c), using 20    the selection process established pursuant to paragraph 21    (2) of this subsection (c). The selected second evaluator 22    may not be the same individual who determined the 23    teacher's "Unsatisfactory" performance evaluation rating 24    preceding remediation, and, if the second evaluator is an 25    administrator, may not be a direct report to the 26    individual who determined the teacher's "Unsatisfactory"   SB0028 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    performance evaluation rating preceding remediation. The 2    school district's authority to select a second evaluator 3    from the list of second evaluators must not be delegated 4    or limited through any agreement with the teacher 5    representatives, provided that nothing shall prohibit a 6    school district and its teacher representatives from 7    agreeing to a formal peer evaluation process as permitted 8    under Article 24A of this Code that could be used to meet 9    the requirements for the selection of second evaluators 10    under this subsection (c).11        (4) The second evaluator selected pursuant to 12    paragraph (3) of this subsection (c) must either (i) 13    conduct the mid-point and final evaluation during 14    remediation or (ii) conduct an independent assessment of 15    whether the teacher completed the remediation plan with a 16    rating equal to or better than a "Proficient" rating, 17    which independent assessment shall include, but is not 18    limited to, personal or video-recorded observations of the 19    teacher that relate to the teacher practice components of 20    the remediation plan. Nothing in this subsection (c) shall 21    be construed to limit or preclude the participation of the 22    evaluator who rated a teacher as "Unsatisfactory" in 23    remediation.24    (d) To institute a dismissal proceeding under this 25Section, the board must first provide written notice to the 26teacher within 30 days after the completion of the final   SB0028 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1remediation evaluation. The notice shall comply with the 2applicable hearing requirements and, in addition, must specify 3that dismissal is sought under this Section and include a copy 4of each performance evaluation relating to the scope of the 5hearing as described in this subsection (d).6    The applicable hearing requirements shall apply to the 7teacher's request for a hearing, the selection and 8qualifications of the hearing officer, and pre-hearing and 9hearing procedures, except that all of the following must be 10met:11        (1) The hearing officer must, in addition to meeting 12    the qualifications set forth in the applicable hearing 13    requirements, have successfully completed the 14    pre-qualification program described in subsection (b) of 15    Section 24A-3 of this Code, unless the State Board of 16    Education waives this requirement to provide an adequate 17    pool of hearing officers for consideration.18        (2) The scope of the hearing must be limited as 19    follows:20            (A) The school district must demonstrate the 21        following:22                (i) that the "Unsatisfactory" performance 23            evaluation rating that preceded remediation 24            applied the teacher practice components and 25            student growth components, if any, and determined 26            an overall evaluation rating of "Unsatisfactory"   SB0028 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1            in accordance with the standards and requirements 2            of the school district's evaluation plan;3                (ii) that the remediation plan complied with 4            the requirements of Section 24A-5 of this Code;5                (iii) that the teacher failed to complete the 6            remediation plan with a performance evaluation 7            rating equal to or better than a "Proficient" 8            rating, based upon a final remediation evaluation 9            meeting the applicable standards and requirements 10            of the school district's evaluation plan; and11                (iv) that if the second evaluator selected 12            pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of 13            this Section does not conduct the mid-point and 14            final evaluation and makes an independent 15            assessment that the teacher completed the 16            remediation plan with a rating equal to or better 17            than a "Proficient" rating, the school district 18            must demonstrate that the final remediation 19            evaluation is a more valid assessment of the 20            teacher's performance than the assessment made by 21            the second evaluator.22            (B) The teacher may only challenge the substantive 23        and procedural aspects of (i) the "Unsatisfactory" 24        performance evaluation rating that led to the 25        remediation, (ii) the remediation plan, and (iii) the 26        final remediation evaluation. To the extent the   SB0028 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1        teacher challenges procedural aspects, including any 2        in applicable collective bargaining agreement 3        provisions, of a relevant performance evaluation 4        rating or the remediation plan, the teacher must 5        demonstrate how an alleged procedural defect 6        materially affected the teacher's ability to 7        demonstrate a level of performance necessary to avoid 8        remediation or dismissal or successfully complete the 9        remediation plan. Without any such material effect, a 10        procedural defect shall not impact the assessment by 11        the hearing officer, board, or reviewing court of the 12        validity of a performance evaluation or a remediation 13        plan.14            (C) The hearing officer shall only consider and 15        give weight to performance evaluations relevant to the 16        scope of the hearing as described in clauses (A) and 17        (B) of this subdivision (2).18        (3) Each party shall be given only 2 days to present 19    evidence and testimony relating to the scope of the 20    hearing, unless a longer period is mutually agreed to by 21    the parties or deemed necessary by the hearing officer to 22    enable a party to present adequate evidence and testimony 23    to address the scope of the hearing, including due to the 24    other party's cross-examination of the party's witnesses.25    (e) The provisions of Sections 24-12 and 34-85 pertaining 26to the decision or recommendation of the hearing officer do   SB0028 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1not apply to dismissal proceedings under this Section. For any 2dismissal proceedings under this Section, the hearing officer 3shall not issue a decision, and shall issue only findings of 4fact and a recommendation, including the reasons therefor, to 5the board to either retain or dismiss the teacher and shall 6give a copy of the report to both the teacher and the 7superintendent of the school district. The hearing officer's 8findings of fact and recommendation must be issued within 30 9days from the close of the record of the hearing.10    The State Board of Education shall adopt rules regarding 11the length of the hearing officer's findings of fact and 12recommendation. If a hearing officer fails without good cause, 13specifically provided in writing to both parties and the State 14Board of Education, to render a recommendation within 30 days 15after the hearing is concluded or the record is closed, 16whichever is later, the parties may mutually agree to select a 17hearing officer pursuant to the alternative procedure, as 18provided in Section 24-12 or 34-85, to rehear the charges 19heard by the hearing officer who failed to render a 20recommendation or to review the record and render a 21recommendation. If any hearing officer fails without good 22cause, specifically provided in writing to both parties and 23the State Board of Education, to render a recommendation 24within 30 days after the hearing is concluded or the record is 25closed, whichever is later, the hearing officer shall be 26removed from the master list of hearing officers maintained by   SB0028 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1the State Board of Education for not more than 24 months. The 2parties and the State Board of Education may also take such 3other actions as it deems appropriate, including recovering, 4reducing, or withholding any fees paid or to be paid to the 5hearing officer. If any hearing officer repeats such failure, 6he or she shall be permanently removed from the master list of 7hearing officers maintained by the State Board of Education.8    (f) The board, within 45 days after receipt of the hearing 9officer's findings of fact and recommendation, shall decide, 10through adoption of a written order, whether the teacher must 11be dismissed from its employ or retained, provided that only 12PERA-trained board members may participate in the vote with 13respect to the decision.14    If the board dismisses the teacher notwithstanding the 15hearing officer's recommendation of retention, the board shall 16make a conclusion, giving its reasons therefor, and such 17conclusion and reasons must be included in its written order. 18The failure of the board to strictly adhere to the timelines 19contained in this Section does not render it without 20jurisdiction to dismiss the teacher. The board shall not lose 21jurisdiction to discharge the teacher if the hearing officer 22fails to render a recommendation within the time specified in 23this Section. The decision of the board is final, unless 24reviewed as provided in subsection (g) of this Section.25    If the board retains the teacher, the board shall enter a 26written order stating the amount of back pay and lost   SB0028 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1benefits, less mitigation, to be paid to the teacher, within 245 days of its retention order.3    (g) A teacher dismissed under this Section may apply for 4and obtain judicial review of a decision of the board in 5accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Review 6Law, except as follows:7        (1) for a teacher dismissed by a school district 8    having 500,000 inhabitants or more, such judicial review 9    must be taken directly to the appellate court of the 10    judicial district in which the board maintains its primary 11    administrative office, and any direct appeal to the 12    appellate court must be filed within 35 days from the date 13    that a copy of the decision sought to be reviewed was 14    served upon the teacher;15        (2) for a teacher dismissed by a school district 16    having less than 500,000 inhabitants after the hearing 17    officer recommended dismissal, such judicial review must 18    be taken directly to the appellate court of the judicial 19    district in which the board maintains its primary 20    administrative office, and any direct appeal to the 21    appellate court must be filed within 35 days from the date 22    that a copy of the decision sought to be reviewed was 23    served upon the teacher; and24        (3) for all school districts, if the hearing officer 25    recommended dismissal, the decision of the board may be 26    reversed only if it is found to be arbitrary, capricious,   SB0028 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    an abuse of discretion, or not in accordance with law.2    In the event judicial review is instituted by a teacher, 3any costs of preparing and filing the record of proceedings 4must be paid by the teacher. If a decision of the board is 5adjudicated upon judicial review in favor of the teacher, then 6the court shall remand the matter to the board with direction 7for entry of an order setting the amount of back pay, lost 8benefits, and costs, less mitigation. The teacher may 9challenge the board's order setting the amount of back pay, 10lost benefits, and costs, less mitigation, through an 11expedited arbitration procedure with the costs of the 12arbitrator borne by the board.13(Source: P.A. 97-8, eff. 6-13-11; 98-513, eff. 1-1-14.) 14    (105 ILCS 5/24A-2.5)15    Sec. 24A-2.5. Definitions. In this Article:16    "Evaluator" means:17        (1) an administrator qualified under Section 24A-3; or18        (2) other individuals qualified under Section 24A-3, 19    provided that, if such other individuals are in the 20    bargaining unit of a district's teachers, the district and 21    the exclusive bargaining representative of that unit must 22    agree to those individuals evaluating other bargaining 23    unit members.24    Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in item (2) of 25this definition, a school district operating under Article 34   SB0028 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1of this Code may require department chairs qualified under 2Section 24A-3 to evaluate teachers in their department or 3departments, provided that the school district shall bargain 4with the bargaining representative of its teachers over the 5impact and effects on department chairs of such a requirement.6    "Implementation date" means, unless otherwise specified 7and provided that the requirements set forth in subsection (d) 8of Section 24A-20 have been met:9        (1) For school districts having 500,000 or more 10    inhabitants, in at least 300 schools by September 1, 2012 11    and in the remaining schools by September 1, 2013.12        (2) For school districts having less than 500,000 13    inhabitants and receiving a Race to the Top Grant or 14    School Improvement Grant after the effective date of this 15    amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, the date 16    specified in those grants for implementing an evaluation 17    system for teachers and principals incorporating student 18    growth as a significant factor.19        (3) For the lowest performing 20% percent of remaining 20    school districts having less than 500,000 inhabitants 21    (with the measure of and school year or years used for 22    school district performance to be determined by the State 23    Superintendent of Education at a time determined by the 24    State Superintendent), September 1, 2015.25        (4) For all other school districts having less than 26    500,000 inhabitants, September 1, 2016.  SB0028 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    Notwithstanding items (3) and (4) of this definition, a 2school district and the exclusive bargaining representative of 3its teachers may jointly agree in writing to an earlier 4implementation date, provided that such date must not be 5earlier than September 1, 2013. The written agreement of the 6district and the exclusive bargaining representative must be 7transmitted to the State Board of Education. 8    "Race to the Top Grant" means a grant made by the Secretary 9of the U.S. Department of Education for the program first 10funded pursuant to paragraph (2) of Section 14006(a) of the 11American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.12    "School Improvement Grant" means a grant made by the 13Secretary of the U.S. Department of Education pursuant to 14Section 1003(g) of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act.15(Source: P.A. 96-861, eff. 1-15-10; 97-8, eff. 6-13-11; 16revised 7-17-24.) 17    (105 ILCS 5/24A-4)  (from Ch. 122, par. 24A-4)18    Sec. 24A-4. Development of evaluation plan. 19    (a) As used in this and the succeeding Sections, "teacher" 20means any and all school district employees regularly required 21to be certified under laws relating to the certification of 22teachers. Each school district shall develop, in cooperation 23with its teachers or, where applicable, the exclusive 24bargaining representatives of its teachers, an evaluation plan 25for all teachers.  SB0028 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    (b) Until July 1, 2025 By no later than the applicable 2implementation date, each school district shall, in good faith 3cooperation with its teachers or, where applicable, the 4exclusive bargaining representatives of its teachers, 5incorporate the use of data and indicators on student growth 6as a significant factor in rating teaching performance, into 7its evaluation plan for all teachers, both those teachers in 8contractual continued service and those teachers not in 9contractual continued service. The plan shall at least meet 10the standards and requirements for student growth and teacher 11evaluation established under Section 24A-7, and specifically 12describe how student growth data and indicators will be used 13as part of the evaluation process, how this information will 14relate to evaluation standards, the assessments or other 15indicators of student performance that will be used in 16measuring student growth and the weight that each will have, 17the methodology that will be used to measure student growth, 18and the criteria other than student growth that will be used in 19evaluating the teacher and the weight that each will have.20    (b-5) Beginning July 1, 2025, each school district may, in 21good faith cooperation with its teachers or, where applicable, 22with the exclusive bargaining representatives of its teachers, 23incorporate the use of data and indicators on student growth 24as a factor in rating teaching performance, into its 25evaluation plan for all teachers in contractual continued 26service and teachers not in contractual continued service. The   SB0028 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1plan shall at least meet the standards and requirements for 2teacher evaluations established under Section 24A-7. 3    To incorporate the use of data and indicators of student 4growth as a significant factor in rating teacher performance 5into the evaluation plan, the district shall use a joint 6committee composed of equal representation selected by the 7district and its teachers or, where applicable, the exclusive 8bargaining representative of its teachers. If, within 180 9calendar days of the committee's first meeting, the committee 10does not reach agreement on the plan, then the district shall 11implement the model evaluation plan established under Section 1224A-7 with respect to the use of data and indicators on student 13growth as a significant factor in rating teacher performance.14    Nothing in this subsection (b) shall make decisions on the 15use of data and indicators on student growth as a significant 16factor in rating teaching performance mandatory subjects of 17bargaining under the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act 18that are not currently mandatory subjects of bargaining under 19the Act.20    The provisions of the Open Meetings Act shall not apply to 21meetings of a joint committee formed under this subsection 22(b). 23    (c) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in subsection 24(b) of this Section, if the joint committee referred to in that 25subsection does not reach agreement on the plan within 90 26calendar days after the committee's first meeting, a school   SB0028 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1district having 500,000 or more inhabitants shall not be 2required to implement any aspect of the model evaluation plan 3and may implement its last best proposal. 4    (d) The Beginning the first school year following the 5effective date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General 6Assembly, the joint committee referred to in subsections 7subsection (b) and (c) of this Section shall meet no less than 8one time annually to assess and review the effectiveness of 9the district's evaluation plan for the purposes of continuous 10improvement of instruction and evaluation practices. 11(Source: P.A. 100-768, eff. 1-1-19.) 12    (105 ILCS 5/24A-5)  (from Ch. 122, par. 24A-5)13    Sec. 24A-5. Content of evaluation plans. This Section does 14not apply to teachers assigned to schools identified in an 15agreement entered into between the board of a school district 16operating under Article 34 of this Code and the exclusive 17representative of the district's teachers in accordance with 18Section 34-85c of this Code. 19    Each school district to which this Article applies shall 20establish a teacher evaluation plan which ensures that each 21teacher in contractual continued service is evaluated at least 22once in the course of every 2 or 3 school years as provided in 23this Section.24    Each school district shall establish a teacher evaluation 25plan that ensures that:  SB0028 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1        (1) each teacher not in contractual continued service 2    is evaluated at least once every school year; and3        (2) except as otherwise provided in this Section, each 4    teacher in contractual continued service is evaluated at 5    least once in the course of every 2 school years. However, 6    any teacher in contractual continued service whose 7    performance is rated as either "needs improvement" or 8    "unsatisfactory" must be evaluated at least once in the 9    school year following the receipt of such rating.10    No later than September 1, 2022, each school district must 11establish a teacher evaluation plan that ensures that each 12teacher in contractual continued service whose performance is 13rated as either "excellent" or "proficient" is evaluated at 14least once in the course of the 3 school years after receipt of 15the rating and implement an informal teacher observation plan 16established by agency rule and by agreement of the joint 17committee established under subsection (b) of Section 24A-4 of 18this Code that ensures that each teacher in contractual 19continued service whose performance is rated as either 20"excellent" or "proficient" is informally observed at least 21once in the course of the 2 school years after receipt of the 22rating. 23    For the 2022-2023 school year only, if the Governor has 24declared a disaster due to a public health emergency pursuant 25to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act, 26a school district may waive the evaluation requirement of all   SB0028 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1teachers in contractual continued service whose performances 2were rated as either "excellent" or "proficient" during the 3last school year in which the teachers were evaluated under 4this Section.5    Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 6or any other Section of this Code, a principal shall not be 7prohibited from evaluating any teachers within a school during 8his or her first year as principal of such school. If a 9first-year principal exercises this option in a school 10district where the evaluation plan provides for a teacher in 11contractual continued service to be evaluated once in the 12course of every 2 or 3 school years, as applicable, then a new 132-year or 3-year evaluation plan must be established. 14    The evaluation plan shall comply with the requirements of 15this Section and of any rules adopted by the State Board of 16Education pursuant to this Section.17    The plan shall include a description of each teacher's 18duties and responsibilities and of the standards to which that 19teacher is expected to conform, and shall include at least the 20following components:21        (a) personal observation of the teacher in the 22    classroom by the evaluator, unless the teacher has no 23    classroom duties.24        (b) consideration of the teacher's attendance, 25    planning, instructional methods, classroom management, 26    where relevant, and competency in the subject matter   SB0028 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    taught.2        (c) (blank). by no later than the applicable 3    implementation date, consideration of student growth as a 4    significant factor in the rating of the teacher's 5    performance.6        (d) (blank). prior to September 1, 2012, rating of the 7    performance of teachers in contractual continued service 8    as either: 9            (i) "excellent", "satisfactory" or 10        "unsatisfactory"; or11            (ii) "excellent", "proficient", "needs 12        improvement" or "unsatisfactory".13        (e) on and after September 1, 2012, rating of the 14    performance of all teachers as "excellent", "proficient", 15    "needs improvement" or "unsatisfactory".16        (f) specification as to the teacher's strengths and 17    weaknesses, with supporting reasons for the comments made.18        (g) inclusion of a copy of the evaluation in the 19    teacher's personnel file and provision of a copy to the 20    teacher.21        (h) within 30 school days after the completion of an 22    evaluation rating a teacher in contractual continued 23    service as "needs improvement", development by the 24    evaluator, in consultation with the teacher, and taking 25    into account the teacher's ongoing on-going professional 26    responsibilities including his or her regular teaching   SB0028 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    assignments, of a professional development plan directed 2    to the areas that need improvement and any supports that 3    the district will provide to address the areas identified 4    as needing improvement.5        (i) within 30 school days after completion of an 6    evaluation rating a teacher in contractual continued 7    service as "unsatisfactory", development and commencement 8    by the district of a remediation plan designed to correct 9    deficiencies cited, provided the deficiencies are deemed 10    remediable. In all school districts the remediation plan 11    for unsatisfactory, tenured teachers shall provide for 90 12    school days of remediation within the classroom, unless an 13    applicable collective bargaining agreement provides for a 14    shorter duration. In all school districts evaluations 15    issued pursuant to this Section shall be issued within 10 16    days after the conclusion of the respective remediation 17    plan. However, the school board or other governing 18    authority of the district shall not lose jurisdiction to 19    discharge a teacher in the event the evaluation is not 20    issued within 10 days after the conclusion of the 21    respective remediation plan.22        (j) participation in the remediation plan by the 23    teacher in contractual continued service rated 24    "unsatisfactory", an evaluator and a consulting teacher 25    selected by the evaluator of the teacher who was rated 26    "unsatisfactory", which consulting teacher is an   SB0028 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    educational employee as defined in the Illinois 2    Educational Labor Relations Act, has at least 5 years' 3    teaching experience, and a reasonable familiarity with the 4    assignment of the teacher being evaluated, and who 5    received an "excellent" rating on his or her most recent 6    evaluation. Where no teachers who meet these criteria are 7    available within the district, the district shall request 8    and the applicable regional office of education shall 9    supply, to participate in the remediation process, an 10    individual who meets these criteria.11        In a district having a population of less than 500,000 12    with an exclusive bargaining agent, the bargaining agent 13    may, if it so chooses, supply a roster of qualified 14    teachers from whom the consulting teacher is to be 15    selected. That roster shall, however, contain the names of 16    at least 5 teachers, each of whom meets the criteria for 17    consulting teacher with regard to the teacher being 18    evaluated, or the names of all teachers so qualified if 19    that number is less than 5. In the event of a dispute as to 20    qualification, the State Board shall determine 21    qualification.22        (k) a mid-point and final evaluation by an evaluator 23    during and at the end of the remediation period, 24    immediately following receipt of a remediation plan 25    provided for under subsections (i) and (j) of this 26    Section. Each evaluation shall assess the teacher's   SB0028 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    performance during the time period since the prior 2    evaluation; provided that the last evaluation shall also 3    include an overall evaluation of the teacher's performance 4    during the remediation period. A written copy of the 5    evaluations and ratings, in which any deficiencies in 6    performance and recommendations for correction are 7    identified, shall be provided to and discussed with the 8    teacher within 10 school days after the date of the 9    evaluation, unless an applicable collective bargaining 10    agreement provides to the contrary. These subsequent 11    evaluations shall be conducted by an evaluator. The 12    consulting teacher shall provide advice to the teacher 13    rated "unsatisfactory" on how to improve teaching skills 14    and to successfully complete the remediation plan. The 15    consulting teacher shall participate in developing the 16    remediation plan, but the final decision as to the 17    evaluation shall be done solely by the evaluator, unless 18    an applicable collective bargaining agreement provides to 19    the contrary. Evaluations at the conclusion of the 20    remediation process shall be separate and distinct from 21    the required annual evaluations of teachers and shall not 22    be subject to the guidelines and procedures relating to 23    those annual evaluations. The evaluator may but is not 24    required to use the forms provided for the annual 25    evaluation of teachers in the district's evaluation plan.26        (l) reinstatement to the evaluation schedule set forth   SB0028 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    in the district's evaluation plan for any teacher in 2    contractual continued service who achieves a rating equal 3    to or better than "satisfactory" or "proficient" in the 4    school year following a rating of "needs improvement" or 5    "unsatisfactory".6        (m) dismissal in accordance with subsection (d) of 7    Section 24-12 or Section 24-16.5 or 34-85 of this Code of 8    any teacher who fails to complete any applicable 9    remediation plan with a rating equal to or better than a 10    "satisfactory" or "proficient" rating. Districts and 11    teachers subject to dismissal hearings are precluded from 12    compelling the testimony of consulting teachers at such 13    hearings under subsection (d) of Section 24-12 or Section 14    24-16.5 or 34-85 of this Code, either as to the rating 15    process or for opinions of performances by teachers under 16    remediation.17        (n) If After the implementation date of an evaluation 18    system for teachers in a district as specified in Section 19    24A-2.5 of this Code, if a teacher in contractual 20    continued service successfully completes a remediation 21    plan following a rating of "unsatisfactory" in an overall 22    performance evaluation received after the foregoing 23    implementation date and receives a subsequent rating of 24    "unsatisfactory" in any of the teacher's overall 25    performance evaluation ratings received during the 26    36-month period following the teacher's completion of the   SB0028 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    remediation plan, then the school district may forgo 2    remediation and seek dismissal in accordance with 3    subsection (d) of Section 24-12 or Section 34-85 of this 4    Code. 5        (o) Teachers who are due to be evaluated in the last 6    year before they are set to retire shall be offered the 7    opportunity to waive their evaluation and to retain their 8    most recent rating, unless the teacher was last rated as 9    "needs improvement" or "unsatisfactory". The school 10    district may still reserve the right to evaluate a teacher 11    provided the district gives notice to the teacher at least 12    14 days before the evaluation and a reason for evaluating 13    the teacher. 14    Nothing in this Section or Section 24A-4 shall be 15construed as preventing immediate dismissal of a teacher for 16deficiencies which are deemed irremediable or for actions 17which are injurious to or endanger the health or person of 18students in the classroom or school, or preventing the 19dismissal or non-renewal of teachers not in contractual 20continued service for any reason not prohibited by applicable 21employment, labor, and civil rights laws. Failure to strictly 22comply with the time requirements contained in Section 24A-5 23shall not invalidate the results of the remediation plan.24    Nothing contained in Public Act 98-648 repeals, 25supersedes, invalidates, or nullifies final decisions in 26lawsuits pending on July 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public   SB0028 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1Act 98-648) in Illinois courts involving the interpretation of 2Public Act 97-8. 3    If the Governor has declared a disaster due to a public 4health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois 5Emergency Management Agency Act that suspends in-person 6instruction, the timelines in this Section connected to the 7commencement and completion of any remediation plan are 8waived. Except if the parties mutually agree otherwise and the 9agreement is in writing, any remediation plan that had been in 10place for more than 45 days prior to the suspension of 11in-person instruction shall resume when in-person instruction 12resumes and any remediation plan that had been in place for 13fewer than 45 days prior to the suspension of in-person 14instruction shall be discontinued and a new remediation period 15shall begin when in-person instruction resumes. The 16requirements of this paragraph apply regardless of whether 17they are included in a school district's teacher evaluation 18plan. 19(Source: P.A. 102-252, eff. 1-1-22; 102-729, eff. 5-6-22; 20103-85, eff. 6-9-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-8-24.) 21    (105 ILCS 5/24A-7)  (from Ch. 122, par. 24A-7)22    Sec. 24A-7. Rules. 23    (a) The State Board of Education is authorized to adopt 24such rules as are deemed necessary to implement and accomplish 25the purposes and provisions of this Article, including, but   SB0028 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1not limited to, rules:2        (1) relating to the methods for measuring student 3    growth (including, but not limited to, limitations on the 4    age of usable data; the amount of data needed to reliably 5    and validly measure growth for the purpose of teacher and 6    principal evaluations; and whether and at what time annual 7    State assessments may be used as one of multiple measures 8    of student growth);9        (2) (blank); defining the term "significant factor" 10    for purposes of including consideration of student growth 11    in performance ratings;12        (3) controlling for such factors as student 13    characteristics (including, but not limited to, students 14    receiving special education and English Learner services), 15    student attendance, and student mobility so as to best 16    measure the impact that a teacher, principal, school and 17    school district has on students' academic achievement;18        (4) establishing minimum requirements for district 19    teacher and principal evaluation instruments and 20    procedures; and21        (5) (blank). establishing a model evaluation plan for 22    use by school districts in which student growth shall 23    comprise 50% of the performance rating. 24    A Notwithstanding any other provision in this Section, 25such rules shall not preclude a school district may use having 26500,000 or more inhabitants from using an annual State   SB0028 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1assessment as a the sole measure of student growth for 2purposes of teacher or principal evaluations.3    (b) (Blank). The State Superintendent of Education shall 4convene a Performance Evaluation Advisory Council, which shall 5be staffed by the State Board of Education. Members of the 6Council shall be selected by the State Superintendent and 7include, without limitation, representatives of teacher unions 8and school district management, persons with expertise in 9performance evaluation processes and systems, as well as other 10stakeholders. The Council shall meet at least quarterly and 11may also meet at the call of the chairperson of the Council, 12following August 18, 2017 (the effective date of Public Act 13100-211) until December 31, 2024. The Council shall advise the 14State Board of Education on the ongoing implementation of 15performance evaluations in this State, which may include 16gathering public feedback, sharing best practices, consulting 17with the State Board on any proposed rule changes regarding 18evaluations, and other subjects as determined by the 19chairperson of the Council. 20    (c) On July 1, 2024, the State Superintendent of Education 21shall convene a Performance Evaluation Advisory Committee for 22the purpose of maintaining and improving the evaluator 23training and pre-qualification program in this State under 24Section 24A-3. The Committee shall be staffed by the State 25Board of Education. Members of the Committee shall include, 26without limitation, representatives from providers of the   SB0028 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1evaluator retraining and pre-qualification program in this 2State, which include teacher unions, school district 3management, including a school district organized under 4Article 34, and a statewide organization representing regional 5offices of education. Members of the Committee shall be 6nominated by the providers and appointed by the State 7Superintendent.8    The Committee shall meet initially at the call of the 9State Superintendent and shall select one member as 10chairperson at its initial meeting. The Committee shall meet 11at least quarterly and may also meet at the call of the 12chairperson of the Committee.13    The Committee shall advise the State Board of Education on 14the continued implementation of the evaluator training and 15pre-qualification program in this State, which may include the 16development and delivery of the program's existing and new 17administrators' academies, gathering feedback from program 18instructors and participants, sharing best practices, 19consulting with the State Board on any proposed rule changes 20regarding evaluator training, and other subjects as determined 21by the chairperson of the Committee. 22    (d) Prior to the applicable implementation date, the rules 23shall not apply to teachers assigned to schools identified in 24an agreement entered into between the board of a school 25district operating under Article 34 of this Code and the 26exclusive representative of the district's teachers in   SB0028 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1accordance with Section 34-85c of this Code. 2(Source: P.A. 102-252, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 3103-617, eff. 7-1-24.) 4    (105 ILCS 5/24A-15)5    Sec. 24A-15. Development of evaluation plan for principals 6and assistant principals.7    (a) Each school district, except for a school district 8organized under Article 34 of this Code, shall establish a 9principal and assistant principal evaluation plan in 10accordance with this Section. The plan must ensure that each 11principal and assistant principal is evaluated as follows:12        (1) For a principal or assistant principal on a 13    single-year contract, the evaluation must take place by 14    March 1 of each year.15        (2) For a principal or assistant principal on a 16    multi-year contract under Section 10-23.8a of this Code, 17    the evaluation must take place by March 1 of the final year 18    of the contract.19    The On and after September 1, 2012, the plan must:20        (i) rate the principal's or assistant principal's 21    performance as "excellent", "proficient", "needs 22    improvement" or "unsatisfactory"; and23        (ii) ensure that each principal and assistant 24    principal is evaluated at least once every school year. 25    Nothing in this Section prohibits a school district from   SB0028 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1conducting additional evaluations of principals and assistant 2principals. 3    For the 2022-2023 school year only, if the Governor has 4declared a disaster due to a public health emergency pursuant 5to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act, 6a school district may waive the evaluation requirement of all 7principals or assistant principals whose performances were 8rated as either "excellent" or "proficient" during the last 9school year in which the principals or assistant principals 10were evaluated under this Section. 11    (b) The evaluation shall include a description of the 12principal's or assistant principal's duties and 13responsibilities and the standards to which the principal or 14assistant principal is expected to conform.15    (c) The evaluation for a principal must be performed by 16the district superintendent, the superintendent's designee, 17or, in the absence of the superintendent or his or her 18designee, an individual appointed by the school board who 19holds a registered and active Professional Educator License 20with a principal endorsement or general administrative 21endorsement Type 75 State administrative certificate.22    The Prior to September 1, 2012, the evaluation must be in 23writing and must at least do all of the following:24        (1) Consider the principal's specific duties, 25    responsibilities, management, and competence as a 26    principal.  SB0028 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1        (2) Specify the principal's strengths and weaknesses, 2    with supporting reasons.3        (3) Align with the Illinois Professional Standards for 4    School Leaders or research-based standards established by 5    administrative rule. 6    Until July 1, 2025 On and after September 1, 2012, the 7evaluation must, in addition to the requirements in items (1), 8(2), and (3) of this subsection (c), provide for the use of 9data and indicators on student growth as a significant factor 10in rating performance. 11    Beginning July 1, 2025, the evaluation must include the 12requirements in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this 13subsection (c). The evaluation may provide for the use of data 14and indicators on student growth as a factor in rating 15performance. 16    (c-5) The evaluation of an assistant principal must be 17performed by the principal, the district superintendent, the 18superintendent's designee, or, in the absence of the 19superintendent or his or her designee, an individual appointed 20by the school board who holds a registered and active 21Professional Educator License with a principal endorsement or 22general administrative endorsement Type 75 State 23administrative certificate. The evaluation must be in writing 24and must at least do all of the following:25        (1) Consider the assistant principal's specific 26    duties, responsibilities, management, and competence as an   SB0028 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    assistant principal.2        (2) Specify the assistant principal's strengths and 3    weaknesses with supporting reasons.4        (3) Align with the Illinois Professional Standards for 5    School Leaders or research-based district standards 6    established by administrative rule.7    Until July 1, 2025 On and after September 1, 2012, the 8evaluation must, in addition to the requirements in items (1), 9(2), and (3) of this subsection (c-5), provide for the use of 10data and indicators on student growth as a significant factor 11in rating performance. 12    Beginning July 1, 2025, the evaluation must include the 13requirements in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this 14subsection (c-5). The evaluation may provide for the use of 15data and indicators on student growth as a factor in rating 16performance. 17    (d) One copy of the evaluation must be included in the 18principal's or assistant principal's personnel file and one 19copy of the evaluation must be provided to the principal or 20assistant principal.21    (e) Failure by a district to evaluate a principal or 22assistant principal and to provide the principal or assistant 23principal with a copy of the evaluation at least once during 24the term of the principal's or assistant principal's contract, 25in accordance with this Section, is evidence that the 26principal or assistant principal is performing duties and   SB0028 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1responsibilities in at least a satisfactory manner and shall 2serve to automatically extend the principal's or assistant 3principal's contract for a period of one year after the 4contract would otherwise expire, under the same terms and 5conditions as the prior year's contract. The requirements in 6this Section are in addition to the right of a school board to 7reclassify a principal or assistant principal pursuant to 8Section 10-23.8b of this Code.9    (f) Nothing in this Section prohibits a school board from 10ordering lateral transfers of principals or assistant 11principals to positions of similar rank and salary. 12(Source: P.A. 102-729, eff. 5-6-22.) 13    (105 ILCS 5/24A-20)14    Sec. 24A-20. State Board of Education data collection and 15evaluation assessment and support systems.16    (a) The On or before the date established in subsection 17(b) of this Section, the State Board of Education shall, 18through a process involving collaboration with the Performance 19Evaluation Advisory Committee Council, develop or contract for 20the development of and implement all of the following data 21collection and evaluation assessment and support systems:22        (1) A system to annually collect and publish data by 23    district and school on teacher and administrator 24    performance evaluation outcomes. The system must ensure 25    that no teacher or administrator can be personally   SB0028 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    identified by publicly reported data.2        (2) Both a teacher and principal model evaluation 3    template. The model templates must incorporate the 4    requirements of this Article and any other requirements 5    established by the State Board by administrative rule, but 6    allow customization by districts in a manner that does not 7    conflict with such requirements.8        (3) An evaluator pre-qualification program based on 9    the model teacher evaluation template.10        (4) An evaluator training program based on the model 11    teacher evaluation template. The training program shall 12    provide multiple training options that account for the 13    prior training and experience of the evaluator.14        (5) A superintendent training program based on the 15    model principal evaluation template.16        (6) One or more instruments to provide feedback to 17    principals on the instructional environment within a 18    school.19        (7) A State Board-provided or approved technical 20    assistance system that supports districts with the 21    development and implementation of teacher and principal 22    evaluation systems.23        (8) Web-based systems and tools supporting 24    implementation of the model templates and the evaluator 25    pre-qualification and training programs.26        (9) A process for measuring and reporting correlations   SB0028 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    between local principal and teacher evaluations and the 2    (A) student growth in tested grades and subjects and (B) 3    retention rates of teachers.4        (10) (Blank). A process for assessing whether school 5    district evaluation systems developed pursuant to this Act 6    and that consider student growth as a significant factor 7    in the rating of a teacher's and principal's performance 8    are valid and reliable, contribute to the development of 9    staff, and improve student achievement outcomes. By no 10    later than September 1, 2014, a research-based study shall 11    be issued assessing such systems for validity and 12    reliability, contribution to the development of staff, and 13    improvement of student performance and recommending, based 14    on the results of this study, changes, if any, that need to 15    be incorporated into teacher and principal evaluation 16    systems that consider student growth as a significant 17    factor in the rating performance for remaining school 18    districts to be required to implement such systems.19    (b) (Blank). If the State of Illinois receives a Race to 20the Top Grant, the data collection and support systems 21described in subsection (a) must be developed on or before 22September 30, 2011. If the State of Illinois does not receive a 23Race to the Top Grant, the data collection and support systems 24described in subsection (a) must be developed on or before 25September 30, 2012; provided, however, that the data 26collection and support systems set forth in items (3) and (4)   SB0028 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1of subsection (a) of this Section must be developed by 2September 30, 2011 regardless of whether the State of Illinois 3receives a Race to the Top Grant. By no later than September 1, 42011, if the State of Illinois receives a Race to the Top 5Grant, or September 1, 2012, if the State of Illinois does not 6receive a Race to the Top Grant, the State Board of Education 7must execute or contract for the execution of the assessment 8referenced in item (10) of subsection (a) of this Section to 9determine whether the school district evaluation systems 10developed pursuant to this Act have been valid and reliable, 11contributed to the development of staff, and improved student 12performance.13    (c) Districts shall submit data and information to the 14State Board on teacher and principal performance evaluations 15and evaluation plans in accordance with procedures and 16requirements for submissions established by the State Board. 17Such data shall include, without limitation, (i) data on the 18performance rating given to all teachers in contractual 19continued service, (ii) data on district recommendations to 20renew or not renew teachers not in contractual continued 21service, and (iii) data on the performance rating given to all 22principals.23    (d) If the State Board of Education does not timely 24fulfill any of the requirements set forth in Sections 24A-7 25and 24A-20, and adequate and sustainable federal, State, or 26other funds are not provided to the State Board of Education   SB0028 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1and school districts to meet their responsibilities under this 2Article, the applicable implementation date shall be postponed 3by the number of calendar days equal to those needed by the 4State Board of Education to fulfill such requirements and for 5the adequate and sustainable funds to be provided to the State 6Board of Education and school districts. The determination as 7to whether the State Board of Education has fulfilled any or 8all requirements set forth in Sections 24A-7 and 24A-20 and 9whether adequate and sustainable funds have been provided to 10the State Board of Education and school districts shall be 11made by the State Board of Education in consultation with the 12P-20 Council.13    (e) The State Board of Education shall annually report 14teacher evaluation data from each school in the State. The 15State Board's report shall include:16        (1) data from the most recent performance evaluation 17    ratings issued prior to the effective date of this 18    amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly for all 19    nontenured teachers and teachers in contractual continued 20    service disaggregated broken down by the race and 21    ethnicity of teachers; and22        (2) data from the most recent performance evaluation 23    ratings issued prior to the effective date of this 24    amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly for all 25    nontenured teachers and teachers in contractual continued 26    service disaggregated broken down by the race, ethnicity,   SB0028 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    and eligibility status for free or reduced-price lunch of 2    students in the school where the teachers work.3    The report shall contain data in an aggregate format. The 4report with the aggregate data is not confidential pursuant to 5Section 24A-7.1 of this Code unless an individual teacher is 6personally identifiable in the report. With respect to the 7report, the underlying data and any personally identifying 8information of a teacher shall be confidential. The State 9Board shall provide the data in the report in a format that 10prevents identification of individual teachers.11(Source: P.A. 103-452, eff. 1-1-24.) 12    (105 ILCS 5/34-8)  (from Ch. 122, par. 34-8)13    Sec. 34-8. Powers and duties of general superintendent. 14The general superintendent of schools shall prescribe and 15control, subject to the approval of the board and to other 16provisions of this Article, the courses of study mandated by 17State law, textbooks, educational apparatus and equipment, 18discipline in and conduct of the schools, and shall perform 19such other duties as the board may by rule prescribe. The 20superintendent shall also notify the State Board of Education, 21the board and the chief administrative official, other than 22the alleged perpetrator himself, in the school where the 23alleged perpetrator serves, that any person who is employed in 24a school or otherwise comes into frequent contact with 25children in the school has been named as a perpetrator in an   SB0028 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1indicated report filed pursuant to the Abused and Neglected 2Child Reporting Act, approved June 26, 1975, as amended.3    The general superintendent may be granted the authority by 4the board to hire a specific number of employees to assist in 5meeting immediate responsibilities. Conditions of employment 6for such personnel shall not be subject to the provisions of 7Section 34-85.8    The general superintendent may, pursuant to a delegation 9of authority by the board and Section 34-18, approve contracts 10and expenditures.11    Pursuant to other provisions of this Article, sites shall 12be selected, schoolhouses located thereon and plans therefor 13approved, and textbooks and educational apparatus and 14equipment shall be adopted and purchased by the board only 15upon the recommendation of the general superintendent of 16schools or by a majority vote of the full membership of the 17board and, in the case of textbooks, subject to Article 28 of 18this Act. The board may furnish free textbooks to pupils and 19may publish its own textbooks and manufacture its own 20apparatus, equipment and supplies.21    In addition, in January of each year, the general 22superintendent of schools shall report to the State Board of 23Education the number of high school students in the district 24who are enrolled in accredited courses (for which high school 25credit will be awarded upon successful completion of the 26courses) at any community college, together with the name and   SB0028 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1number of the course or courses which each such student is 2taking.3    The general superintendent shall also have the authority 4to monitor the performance of attendance centers, to identify 5and place an attendance center on remediation and probation, 6and to recommend to the board that the attendance center be 7placed on intervention and be reconstituted, subject to the 8provisions of Sections 34-8.3 and 8.4.9    The general superintendent, or his or her designee, shall 10conduct an annual evaluation of each principal in the district 11pursuant to guidelines promulgated by the Board and the Board 12approved principal evaluation form. The evaluation shall be 13based on factors, including the following: (i) student 14academic improvement, as defined by the school improvement 15plan; (ii) student absenteeism rates at the school; (iii) 16instructional leadership; (iv) effective implementation of 17programs, policies, or strategies to improve student academic 18achievement; (v) school management; and (vi) other factors, 19including, without limitation, the principal's communication 20skills and ability to create and maintain a student-centered 21learning environment, to develop opportunities for 22professional development, and to encourage parental 23involvement and community partnerships to achieve school 24improvement.25    The Effective no later than September 1, 2012, the general 26superintendent or his or her designee shall develop a written   SB0028 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1principal evaluation plan. The evaluation plan must be in 2writing and shall supersede the evaluation requirements set 3forth in this Section. The evaluation plan must do at least all 4of the following:5        (1) Provide for annual evaluation of all principals 6    employed under a performance contract by the general 7    superintendent or his or her designee, no later than July 8    1st of each year.9        (2) Consider the principal's specific duties, 10    responsibilities, management, and competence as a 11    principal.12        (3) Specify the principal's strengths and weaknesses, 13    with supporting reasons.14        (4) Align with research-based standards.15        (5) Until July 1, 2025, use Use data and indicators on 16    student growth as a significant factor in rating principal 17    performance.18    Beginning July 1, 2025, the evaluation plan may provide 19for the use of data and indicators on student growth as a 20factor in rating performance. 21(Source: P.A. 95-496, eff. 8-28-07; 96-861, eff. 1-15-10.) 22    (105 ILCS 5/34-85c)23    Sec. 34-85c. Alternative procedures for teacher 24evaluation, remediation, and removal for cause after 25remediation.  SB0028 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1    (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board and 2the exclusive representative of the district's teachers are 3hereby authorized to enter into an agreement to establish 4alternative procedures for teacher evaluation, remediation, 5and removal for cause after remediation, including an 6alternative system for peer evaluation and recommendations; 7provided, however, that no later than September 1, 2012: (i) 8any alternative procedures must include provisions whereby 9student performance data is a significant factor in teacher 10evaluation and (ii) teachers are rated as "excellent", 11"proficient", "needs improvement" or "unsatisfactory". 12Pursuant exclusively to that agreement, teachers assigned to 13schools identified in that agreement shall be subject to an 14alternative performance evaluation plan and remediation 15procedures in lieu of the plan and procedures set forth in 16Article 24A of this Code and alternative removal for cause 17standards and procedures in lieu of the removal standards and 18procedures set forth in Section 34-85 of this Code. To the 19extent that the agreement provides a teacher with an 20opportunity for a hearing on removal for cause before an 21independent hearing officer in accordance with Section 34-85 22or otherwise, the hearing officer shall be governed by the 23alternative performance evaluation plan, remediation 24procedures, and removal standards and procedures set forth in 25the agreement in making findings of fact and a recommendation.26    (a-5) If the Governor has declared a disaster due to a   SB0028 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois 2Emergency Management Agency Act that suspends in-person 3instruction, the timelines connected to the commencement and 4completion of any remediation plan are paused. Except where 5the parties mutually agree otherwise and such agreement is in 6writing, any remediation plan that had been in place for 45 or 7more days prior to the suspension of in-person instruction 8shall resume when in-person instruction resumes; any 9remediation plan that had been in place for fewer than 45 days 10prior to the suspension of in-person instruction shall 11discontinue and a new remediation period will begin when 12in-person instruction resumes. 13    (a-10) No later than September 1, 2022, the school 14district must establish a teacher evaluation plan that ensures 15that each teacher in contractual continued service whose 16performance is rated as either "excellent" or "proficient" is 17evaluated at least once in the course of the 3 school years 18after receipt of the rating and establish an informal teacher 19observation plan that ensures that each teacher in contractual 20continued service whose performance is rated as either 21"excellent" or "proficient" is informally observed at least 22once in the course of the 2 school years after receipt of the 23rating. 24    (a-15) (Blank). For the 2022-2023 school year only, if the 25Governor has declared a disaster due to a public health 26emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency   SB0028 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1Management Agency Act, the school district may waive the 2evaluation requirement of any teacher in contractual continued 3service whose performance was rated as either "excellent" or 4"proficient" during the last school year in which the teacher 5was evaluated under this Section.6    (b) The board and the exclusive representative of the 7district's teachers shall submit a certified copy of an 8agreement as provided under subsection (a) of this Section to 9the State Board of Education.10(Source: P.A. 101-643, eff. 6-18-20; 102-252, eff. 1-1-22; 11102-729, eff. 5-6-22.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132025.  SB0028 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 07498 LNS 17542 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    105 ILCS 5/24-16.54    105 ILCS 5/24A-2.55    105 ILCS 5/24A-4from Ch. 122, par. 24A-46    105 ILCS 5/24A-5from Ch. 122, par. 24A-57    105 ILCS 5/24A-7from Ch. 122, par. 24A-78    105 ILCS 5/24A-159    105 ILCS 5/24A-2010    105 ILCS 5/34-8from Ch. 122, par. 34-811    105 ILCS 5/34-85c